src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON propernouns
Абъячой:Абъячой Prop-Plc  "" ;
Агней:Агней Prop-Fem  "" ;
Агнюша:Агнюша Prop-Fem  "" ;
Агрикола:Агрикола PROP_  "" ;
Агӧй:Агӧй Prop-Fem  "" ;
Адзва:Адзва Prop-Plc  "" ;
Айкатыла:Айкатыла Prop-Plc  "" ;
Айкина:Айкина Prop-Plc  "" ;
Айюва:Айюва Prop-Plc  "" ;
Аквад:Аквад Prop-Plc  "" ;
Аланды:Аланды Prop-Plc  "" ;
Аланды% ді% чукӧр:Аланды% ді% чукӧр Prop-Plc  "" ;
Аландыса% чукӧра% діяс:Аландыса% чукӧра% діяс Prop-Plc  "" ;
Але:Але Prop-Fem  "" ;
Альбина:Альбина Prop-Fem  "" ;
Америкаса% Ӧтувтчӧм% Штатъяс:Америкаса% Ӧтувтчӧм% Штатъяс Prop-Plc  "" ;
Анастасия:Анастасия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Анна:Анна Prop-Fem  "" ;
Антонида:Антонида Prop-Fem  "" ;
Анфиса:Анфиса Prop-Fem  "" ;
Аныб:Аныб Prop-Plc  "" ;
Анют:Анют Prop-Fem  "" ;
Апраксия:Апраксия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Аравия:Аравия Prop-Plc  "" ;
Ариматияса:Ариматияса PROP_  "" ;
Архангельск% область:Архангельск% область Prop-Plc  "" ;
Африка:Африка Prop-Plc  "" ;
АӦШ:АӦШ ACRON  "" ;
Бадьёлйыв:Бадьёлйыл PROP_  "" ;
Байтек% Силур% компания:Байтек% Силур% компания Prop-Plc  "" ;
Башкортостан:Башкортостан Prop-Plc  "" ;
Беларусь:Беларусь Prop-Plc  "" ;
Белорус:Белорус Prop-Plc  "" ;
Бельгия:Бельгия Prop-Plc  "" ;
Библия:Библия PROP_  "" ;
Босния:Босния Prop-Plc  "" ;
Брежнев:Брежнев Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Бурводстрой:Бурводстрой Prop-Plc  "" ;
Буско:Буско PROP_  "" ;
Бушенев:Бушенев Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Вадбӧж:Вадбӧж PROP_  "" ;
Вадыб:Вадыб PROP_  "" ;
Важгорт:Важгорт PROP_  "" ;
Валентина:Валентина Prop-Fem  "" ;
Варук:Варук Prop-Fem  "" ;
Васильевна:Васильевна PROP_  "" ;
Вассук:Вассук Prop-Fem  "" ;
Вашка:Вашка PROP_  "" ;
Великӧй% Отечественнӧй% война:Великӧй% Отечественнӧй% война Prop-Org  "" ;
Венесуэла:Венесуэла Prop-Plc  "" ;
Весляна:Весляна PROP_  "" ;
Виздін:Виздін PROP_  "" ;
Визюк:Визюк PROP_  "" ;
Вика:Вика Prop-Fem  "" ;
Вой% саридз:Вой% саридз PROP_  "" ;
Войвывса% кытш:Войвывса% кытш PROP_  "" ;
Войвывса% сӧвет:Войвывса% сӧвет PROP_  "" ;
Волгоград:Волгоград Prop-Plc  "" ;
Волся:Волся PROP_  "" ;
Вуктыл:Вуктыл2 PROP_  "" ;
Выльгорт:Выльгорт PROP_  "" ;
Вычегодскӧй% судӧвӧй% компания:Вычегодскӧй% судӧвӧй% компания PROP_  "" ;
Вьетнам:Вьетнам Prop-Plc  "" ;
Вӧркута:Вӧркута Prop-Plc  "" ;
Галко:Галко Prop-Fem  "" ;
Гаша:Гаша Prop-Fem  "" ;
Глаш:Глаш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Гнедко:Гнедко PROP_  "" ;
Горва:Горва Prop-Plc  "" ;
Граня:Граня Prop-Fem  "" ;
Гренлан:Гренлан Prop-Plc  "" ;
Густа:Густа Prop-Fem  "" ;
Давид:Давид PROP_  "" ;
Даша:Даша Prop-Fem  "" ;
Декаполи:Декаполи PROP_  "" ;
Дереваннӧй:Дереваннӧй Prop-Plc  "" ;
Динӧ:Динӧ Prop-Fem  "" ;
Донецк:Донецк Prop-Plc  "" ;
Доруш:Доруш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Дядю:Дядю Prop-Fem  "" ;
Евдокия:Евдокия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Евстолия:Евстолия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Елен:Елен Prop-Fem  "" ;
Елись:Елись Prop-Fem  "" ;
Елюк:Елюк Prop-Fem  "" ;
Емва:Емва Prop-Plc  "" ;
Ереван:Ереван Prop-Plc  "" ;
Ефимия:Ефимия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Зеленоборск:Зеленоборск2 PROP_  "" ;
Зосьӧ:Зосьӧ Prop-Fem  "" ;
Зӧвсьӧрт:Зӧвсьӧрт PROP_  "" ;
Ижкар:Ижкар Prop-Plc  "" ;
Из% сай:Из% сай Prop-Plc  "" ;
Изъюров:Изъюров Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Индонезия:Индонезия Prop-Plc  "" ;
Инта:Инта Prop-Plc  "" ;
Иринь:Иринь Prop-Fem  "" ;
Иркутск:Иркутск2 Prop-Plc  "" ;
Испания:Испания Prop-Plc  "" ;
Йӧлгинь:Йӧлгинь Prop-Fem  "" ;
КПСС:КПСС ACRON  "" ;
Кавказ:Кавказ Prop-Plc  "" ;
Казахстан:Казахстан Prop-Plc  "" ;
Калининград:Калининград Prop-Plc  "" ;
Калиса:Калиса Prop-Fem  "" ;
Канева:Канева PROP_  "" ;
Каракчиев:Каракчиев Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Кардор:Кардор PROP_  "" ;
Каретина:Каретина Prop-Fem  "" ;
Катюк:Катюк Prop-Fem  "" ;
Кебанъёль:Кебанъёль PROP_  "" ;
Кекур:Кекур PROP_  "" ;
Кира:Кира Prop-Fem  "" ;
Клавдия:Клавдия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Клапорд:Клапорд PROP_  "" ;
Клара:Клара Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ковалев:Ковалев Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Койгорт:Койгорт PROP_  "" ;
Колва:Колва PROP_  "" ;
Коломбо:Коломбо Prop-Plc  "" ;
Коми% Республика:Коми% Республика Prop-Plc  "" ;
Коми% му:Коми% му PROP_  "" ;
Комиавиа:Комиавиа PROP_  "" ;
Комилес:Комилес PROP_  "" ;
Комимелиорация:Комимелиорация PROP_  "" ;
Комиэнерго:Комиэнерго PROP_  "" ;
Конго:Конго Prop-Plc  "" ;
Коскова:Коскова PROP_  "" ;
Косово:Косово Prop-Plc  "" ;
Крестинь:Крестинь Prop-Fem  "" ;
Кристос:Кристос PROP_  "" ;
Куба:Куба Prop-Plc  "" ;
Куратов:Куратов Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Кырув:Кырул PROP_  "" ;
Лаос:Лаос Prop-Plc  "" ;
Лареш:Лареш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ледя:Ледя Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ленинград:Ленинград Prop-Plc  "" ;
Летка:Летка PROP_  "" ;
Лида:Лида Prop-Fem  "" ;
Лидь:Лидь Prop-Fem  "" ;
Лизук:Лизук Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ликерья:Ликерья Prop-Fem  "" ;
Луза:Луза PROP_  "" ;
Лукерья:Лукерья Prop-Fem  "" ;
Лунвыв% Емен:Лунвыв% Емен PROP_  "" ;
Лыткин:Лыткин Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Лыюров:Лыюров Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Люля:Люля Prop-Fem  "" ;
Магнолия:Магнолия Prop-Plc  "" ;
Максаковка:Максаковка PROP_  "" ;
Малайя:Малайя Prop-Plc  "" ;
Манипа:Манипа Prop-Fem  "" ;
Мари:Мари Prop-Plc  "" ;
Марина:Марина Prop-Fem  "" ;
Марфида:Марфида Prop-Fem  "" ;
Матруш:Матруш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Мездысь:Мездысь PROP_  "" ;
Миссисипи:Миссисипи Prop-Plc  "" ;
Мони:Мони Prop-Fem  "" ;
Мушӧр% Саридз:Мушӧр% Саридз Prop-Plc  "" ;
Мылдін:Мылдін PROP_  "" ;
Настук:Настук Prop-Fem  "" ;
Никарагуа:Никарагуа Prop-Plc  "" ;
Нилук:Нилук Prop-Fem  "" ;
Новосибирск:Новосибирск2 PROP_  "" ;
Новосибирск:Новосибирск2 Prop-Plc  "" ;
Овкӧдж:Овкӧдж Prop-Plc  "" ;
Окма:Окма PROP_  "" ;
Олдоття:Олдоття Prop-Fem  "" ;
Омск:Омск2 Prop-Plc  "" ;
Опонась:Опонась Prop-Fem  "" ;
Осетия:Осетия Prop-Plc  "" ;
Осипова:Осипова Prop-Sur-Fem  "" ;
Паджга:Паджга PROP_  "" ;
Палаш:Палаш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Параскева:Параскева Prop-Fem  "" ;
Певрунь:Певрунь Prop-Fem  "" ;
Пезмӧг:Пезмӧг PROP_  "" ;
Пелюш:Пелюш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Печора% бассейн:Печора% бассейн PROP_  "" ;
Печора% вож:Печора% вож Prop-Plc  "" ;
Питир:Питир PROP_  "" ;
Полина:Полина Prop-Fem  "" ;
Пульхерия:Пульхерия Prop-Fem  "" ;
Пырас:Пырас PROP_  "" ;
Римуш:Римуш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ромбандеева:Ромбандеева Prop-Sur-Fem  "" ;
Российскӧй% Федерация:Российскӧй% Федерация PROP_  "" ;
Рочму:Рочму Prop-Plc  "" ;
Ручевскӧй:Ручевскӧй PROP_  "" ;
Рӧство:Рӧство PROP_  "" ;
Сахалин:Сахалин Prop-Plc  "" ;
Сашук:Сашук Prop-Fem  "" ;
Сибыр:Сибыр Prop-Plc  "" ;
Совдор:Совдор PROP_  "" ;
Ставрополь:Ставрополь Prop-Plc  "" ;
Сталин:Сталин Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Степанида:Степанида Prop-Fem  "" ;
Суматра:Суматра Prop-Plc  "" ;
Суоми:Суоми PROP_  "" ;
Суэц:Суэц Prop-Plc  "" ;
Сыктывкаравтотранс:Сыктывкаравтотранс PROP_  "" ;
Сюдӧ:Сюдӧ PROP_  "" ;
Сӧснагорт:Сӧснагорт Prop-Plc  "" ;
Таись:Таись Prop-Fem  "" ;
Таллинн:Таллинн Prop-Plc  "" ;
Татьӧ:Татьӧ Prop-Fem  "" ;
Тепловодоканал:Тепловодоканал PROP_  "" ;
Тибет:Тибет Prop-Plc  "" ;
Тимин:Тимин Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Томск:Томск2 Prop-Plc  "" ;
Торопов:Торопов Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Тутӧ:Тутӧ PROP_  "" ;
Уголовнӧй% кодекс:Уголовнӧй% кодекс PROP_  "" ;
Улита:Улита Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ульяновск:Ульяновск2 Prop-Plc  "" ;
Уля:Уля Prop-Fem  "" ;
Уляшев:Уляшев Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Усва:Усва PROP_  "" ;
Ухта:Ухта PROP_  "" ;
Феония:Феония Prop-Fem  "" ;
Финн% куръя:Финн% куръя Prop-Plc  "" ;
Хозяинова:Хозяинова Prop-Sur-Fem  "" ;
ЦВК:ЦВК ACRON  "" ;
Цыпанов:Цыпанов Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Челябинск:Челябинск2 Prop-Plc  "" ;
Чож% ю:Чож% ю Prop-Plc  "" ;
Шойнаты:Шойнаты PROP_  "" ;
Ыджыд% лун:Ыджыд% лун PROP_  "" ;
Ылі% Кавказ:Ылі% Кавказ Prop-Plc  "" ;
Эжва:Эжва Prop-Plc  "" ;
Эфиопия:Эфиопия Prop-Plc  "" ;
Юля:Юля Prop-Fem  "" ;
Юрйыв% кодзув:Юрйыв% кодзул Prop-Plc  "" ;
Юшков:Юшков Prop-Sur-Mal  "" ;
Ямал% кӧдж:Ямал% кӧдж Prop-Plc  "" ;
Япония:Япония Prop-Plc  "" ;
август:август PROP_  "" ;
вежалун:вежалун PROP_  "" ;
выльлун:выльлун PROP_  "" ;
июнь:июнь PROP_  "" ;
май:май PROP_  "" ;
миян% бӧрысь% олысь% йӧзлӧн% фонд:миян% бӧрысь% олысь% йӧзлӧн% фонд PROP_  "" ;
ноябрь:ноябрь PROP_  "" ;
октябр:октябр Prop-R-RY  "" ;
подмосковье:подмосковье PROP_  "" ;
сора% тӧлысь:сора% тӧлысь PROP_  "" ;
шӧр% нэмъяс:шӧр% нэмъяс PROP_  "" ;
январ:январ Prop-R-RY  "" ;
Ӧгрепен:Ӧгрепен Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ӧдюк:Ӧдюк Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ӧксюш:Ӧксюш Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ӧльӧн:Ӧльӧн Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ӧпрӧсь:Ӧпрӧсь Prop-Fem  "" ;
Ӧсип:Ӧсип PROP_  "" ;
